Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.500

Community juvenile accountability programs—Findings—Purpose.

The legislature finds that meaningful community involvement is vital to the juvenile justice system's ability to respond to the serious problem of juvenile crime. Citizens and crime victims need to be active partners in responding to crime, in the management of resources, and in the disposition decisions regarding juvenile offenders in their community. Involvement of citizens and crime victims increase offender accountability and build healthier communities, which will reduce recidivism and crime rates in Washington state.

The legislature also finds that local governments are in the best position to develop, coordinate, and manage local community prevention, intervention, and corrections programs for juvenile offenders, and to determine local resource priorities. Local community management will build upon local values and increase local control of resources, encourage the use of a comprehensive range of community-based intervention strategies.

The primary purpose of RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540, the community juvenile accountability act, is to provide a continuum of community-based programs that emphasize the juvenile offender's accountability for his or her actions while assisting him or her in the development of skills necessary to function effectively and positively in the community in a manner consistent with public safety.

[ 1997 c 338 s 60.]

NOTES:

Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338 ss 60-64: "The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate the costs and benefits of the programs funded in sections 60 through 64 of this act. The evaluation must measure whether the programs cost-effectively reduce recidivism and crime rates in Washington state. The institute shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 1998, and December 1, 2000." [ 1997 c 338 s 65.]

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.